Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB24.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Office of New Americans Act.Section 102. Legislative policy and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) According to the United States Census Bureau, Pennsylvania ranked 42nd among the 50 states in population growth from April 1, 2010, to July 1, 2013, increasing only 0.56%.(2) In 2012, Pennsylvania's 769,264 foreign-born individuals comprised 6% of this Commonwealth's population, an increase of 1.9% since 2000.(3) Throughout this Commonwealth's history, immigrants have played a critical role in this Commonwealth's economic, cultural and political growth and success.(4) Policies that promote the attraction, retention and integration of immigrants will help enhance this Commonwealth's economy and diversity, thereby improving the lives of all residents and helping to remove barriers that may undermine immigrants' full potential.(5) Immigrants currently fill skilled positions throughout this Commonwealth's economy and are a vital part of this Commonwealth's economy and tax base.(6) Thirty-eight percent of immigrants in this Commonwealth have a bachelor of arts, bachelor of science or graduate degree, compared to 28% of United-States-born 20250SB0024PN0009 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvanians.(7) Organizations, including the Welcoming Center for New Pennsylvanians and Vibrant Pittsburgh, are providing leadership in this Commonwealth's immigrant integration efforts through programs and services that connect newcomers and longtime Pennsylvanians to economic opportunity.(8) It is essential for this Commonwealth's future that skilled, energetic and entrepreneurial immigrants are attracted and retained. Their presence helps to bolster this Commonwealth's economy and strengthen the social and cultural fabric.(9) States enforce and provide for many services, licenses and educational and economic opportunities that make it imperative to offer guidance to State government agencies and to immigrants on how to navigate these resources.(10) The creation of an Office of New Americans will help to improve the lives of immigrants and Pennsylvanians generally by recognizing these facts and promoting these goals.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The Advisory Committee to Office of New Americans established in section 501."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Office." The Office of New Americans established in section 301."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic 20250SB0024PN0009 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Development of the Commonwealth.CHAPTER 3OFFICE OF NEW AMERICANSSection 301. Establishment of office.The Office of New Americans is established within the department.Section 302. Powers and duties of office.The office shall:(1) Respond to inquiries from Commonwealth agencies, the media, immigrant-serving organizations and the public about immigration issues in this Commonwealth.(2) Serve as point of contact for Commonwealth licensing boards and the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs.(3) Serve as an information clearinghouse for Commonwealth agencies on immigration-related policy issues and coordinate among agencies as appropriate.(4) Analyze economic and demographic trends and make policy recommendations.(5) Develop strategies to attract, retain and incorporate immigrants into this Commonwealth.(6) Ensure that the Commonwealth is gathering relevant data to inform the Commonwealth's policy making on immigrant issues.(7) Convene stakeholders in business development and international trade promotion programs to increase capacity to draw on immigrant contributors.(8) Disseminate information to new and prospective immigrant residents of this Commonwealth who wish to invest capital, launch businesses or apply their skills in this 20250SB0024PN0009 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(9) Convene municipal officials to boost peer learning on increasing immigration in cities of the third class struggling with population loss and economic decline.(10) Convene college and university officials to foster learning on strategies for immigrant and international student retention.(11) Provide matching grant funds for high-quality immigration and economic development programs that can demonstrate corporate or philanthropic investment.(12) Evaluate the success of activities and adjust courses as appropriate.CHAPTER 5ADVISORY COMMITTEE TOOFFICE OF NEW AMERICANSSection 501. Establishment of advisory committee.The Advisory Committee to Office of New Americans is established within the office and shall serve in an advisory capacity to the office in matters regarding immigrants in this Commonwealth. The advisory committee shall be staffed and administered by the office.Section 502. Membership.(a) Public official members.--The advisory committee shall consist of the following members, who shall serve by virtue of their public position:(1) The secretary or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Administration or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Health or a designee.(5) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.20250SB0024PN0009 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(7) The Secretary of Transportation or a designee.(8) The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police or a designee.(b) Nongovernmental members.--The advisory committee shall consist of nongovernmental members to be appointed by the Governor as follows:(1) Two members from an organization that attracts, retains and integrates immigrants into this Commonwealth's society.(2) One member from a Pennsylvania chapter of the American Immigration Lawyers Association.(3) One member from an institution of higher education who has a primary focus on immigration issues.(4) One member from the Pennsylvania Chamber of Business and Industry or a similar local advocate for economic improvement.(5) One member with expertise in accessing language resources for those who use English as a second language.(6) One member from the Pennsylvania banking sector.(7) One member from a workforce training agency.(8) One member from the health care sector.(9) One member from the health insurance sector.(10) One member from a human services agency.(11) One member from a refugee resettlement agency.(c) Voting.--(1) All members appointed shall hold voting privileges on all matters brought for consideration before the advisory committee.(2) A simple majority of members with current 20250SB0024PN0009 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointments to the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. An action adopted by the majority of the members present at a meeting in which there is a quorum shall be deemed to be an act of the advisory committee.(d) Terms.--(1) The terms of the members under subsection (a) shall be concurrent with their holding of the public office.(2) A member appointed under subsection (b) shall serve a three-year term as long as they represent the interest of the membership class for which they were appointed and shall serve until a successor is appointed.(e) Chairperson.--The secretary shall serve as chairperson of the advisory committee.(f) Expenses of members.--Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services. Members who are not employees of State government shall be reimbursed at established Commonwealth rates for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the advisory committee.Section 503. Powers and duties of advisory committee.(a) Powers and duties.--The advisory committee shall:(1) Make recommendations to the Governor and the secretary on policies, procedures, regulations and legislation that help to attract, retain and integrate immigrants into this Commonwealth's society.(2) Serve as the Governor's liaison to new Americans on policies, procedures, regulations and legislation that affect immigrants, in order to ensure that State government is accessible, accountable and responsive to the needs of immigrants.20250SB0024PN0009 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Serve as a resource to all departments, commissions and agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction to ensure that these government entities are cognizant of the needs of immigrants and that their respective services and programs are accessible to immigrants.(4) Work with the office to monitor the practices of Commonwealth agencies relating to the attraction, retention and integration of immigrants in order to maximize the efficiency and accessibility to State government.(5) Perform other duties as the Governor and secretary may assign in planning for services and programs for immigrants.(b) Studies and reports.--The advisory committee may conduct studies and issue reports upon request and as it deems necessary on issues affecting immigrants in this Commonwealth.(c) Public hearings.--The advisory committee shall conduct at least one public hearing each year to receive testimony and public comments on how State government can improve the attraction, retention and integration of immigrants in this Commonwealth.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the advisory committee from establishing ad hoc work groups or local committees to assist in research and other duties necessary to carry out the mission of the office.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0024PN0009 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728